Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-1901
Act, how cited.

Sections 50-1901 to 50-1921 shall be known and may be cited as the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act.

Laws 2015, LB598, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB1094, § 28;

Laws 2017, LB539, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2021), § 47-901;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 45.